Utah statutes.
31A-41-303.   Court determination and order.

Subject to the requirements of this part, if the court determines that a claim should be levied against the fund, the court shall enter an order directing the department to pay from the fund that portion of the petitioner's judgment that is payable from the fund.



Enacted by Chapter 220, 2008 General Session

